District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.21

Findings.

The Council finds that in order for the development of the new convention center hotel to proceed, it is necessary for the District and the Authority to lease to Marriott International, Inc., the developer of the new convention center hotel, or its designee, 2 parcels of land that are part of the site of the new convention center hotel.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 221, formerly § 701
as added Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 201, 53 DCR 5430
renumbered Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 122(d), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 701 to § 221.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).